Utah statutes.
41-3-506.   Special plates -- Expiration.

(1)  A special plate issued expires:

(a)  on June 30 each year; or

(b)  upon the cancellation, suspension, or revocation of the licensee's license.

(2)  Under Subsection (1)(b), the plates shall be returned to the licensee upon reinstatement of his license.

(3)  A new plate or plates, or renewal decal, for the ensuing year may be obtained by the licensee submitting a new application to the division and paying the dealer, dismantler, manufacturer, or transporter plate fee provided by law.

